Utah statutes.
57-22-4.1.   Failure to deliver possession of residential rental unit -- Renter's option to terminate rental agreement -- Abatement of rent.

(1)  If an owner fails to deliver possession of a residential rental unit on the date provided in the rental agreement:

(a)  the renter may, by written notice to the owner, terminate the rental agreement; or

(b)  if the renter chooses not to terminate the rental agreement, rent abates until the owner delivers possession as provided in the rental agreement.

(2)  If a renter terminates a rental agreement under Subsection (1)(a), the owner shall, as promptly as reasonable, return to the renter all prepaid rent and any security deposit.



Enacted by Chapter 98, 2012 General Session

